Mississippi, session 2026, HB908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-631, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-631.  (1)  The registrar shall enclose with each ballot mailed to an absent elector separate printed instructions furnished by the registrar containing the following: (a)  All absentee voters, excepting those with temporary or permanent physical disabilities or those who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, who mark their ballots in the county of the residence shall use the registrar of that county as the witness.  The absentee voter shall come to the office of the registrar and neither the registrar nor his or her deputy shall be required to go out of the registrar's office to serve as an attesting witness. (b)  Upon receipt of the enclosed ballot, you will not mark the ballot except in view or sight of the attesting witness.  In the sight or view of the attesting witness, mark the ballot according to instructions. (c)  After marking the ballot, fill out and sign the "ELECTOR'S CERTIFICATE" in the box on the back of the envelope so that the signature is across the flap of the envelope to ensure the integrity of the ballot.  All absent electors shall have the attesting witness sign the "ATTESTING WITNESS CERTIFICATE" in the box across the flap on the back of the envelope.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  Place the necessary postage on the envelope and deposit it in the post office or some government receptacle provided for the deposit of mail so that the absent elector's ballot will be postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar no more than five (5) business days after the election.  The ballot may only be transmitted by the United States Postal Service or other common carriers, including, but not limited to, United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation. Any notary public, United States postmaster, assistant United States postmaster, United States postal supervisor, clerk in charge of a contract postal station, or other officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment may be an attesting witness; provided, however, that in the case of an absent elector who is temporarily or permanently physically disabled, the attesting witness may be any person eighteen (18) years of age or older and such person is not required to have the authority to administer an oath.  If a postmaster, assistant postmaster, postal supervisor, or clerk in charge of a contract postal station acts as an attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate must be authenticated by the cancellation stamp of their respective post offices.  If an officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment acts as attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate, together with his or her title and address, but no seal, shall be required.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  Any affidavits made by an absent elector who is in the Armed Forces may be executed before a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer not lower in grade than sergeant rating or any person authorized to administer oaths. (d)  When the application accompanies the ballot it shall not be returned in the same envelope as the ballot but shall be returned in a separate pre-addressed envelope provided by the registrar. (e)  A candidate for public office, or the spouse, parent or child of a candidate for public office, may not be an attesting witness for any absentee ballot upon which the candidate's name appears, unless the voter is related within the first degree to the candidate or the spouse, parent or child of the candidate. (f)  Any voter casting an absentee ballot who declares that he or she requires assistance to vote by reason of blindness, temporary or permanent physical disability or inability to read or write, shall be entitled to receive assistance in the marking of his or her absentee ballot and in completing the affidavit on the absentee ballot envelope.  The voter may be given assistance by anyone of the voter's choice other than a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked, the spouse, parent or child of a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked or the voter's employer, an agent of that employer or a union representative; however, a candidate whose name is on the ballot or the spouse, parent or child of such candidate may provide assistance upon request to any voter who is related within the first degree.  In order to ensure the integrity of the ballot, any person who provides assistance to an absentee voter shall be required to sign and complete the "Certificate of Person Providing Voter Assistance" on the absentee ballot envelope. (2)  The foregoing instructions required to be provided by the registrar to the elector shall also constitute the substantive law pertaining to the handling of absentee ballots by the elector and registrar. (3)  The Secretary of State shall prepare instructions on how absent voters may comply with the identification requirements of Section 23-15-563. [From and after the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-631.  (1)  The registrar shall enclose with each ballot mailed to an absent elector separate printed instructions furnished by the registrar containing the following: (a)  All absentee voters, excepting those with temporary or permanent physical disabilities or those who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, who mark their ballots in the county of the residence shall use the registrar of that county as the witness.  The absentee voter shall come to the office of the registrar and neither the registrar nor his or her deputy shall be required to go out of the registrar's office to serve as an attesting witness. (b)  Upon receipt of the enclosed ballot, you will not mark the ballot except in view or sight of the attesting witness.  In the sight or view of the attesting witness, mark the ballot according to instructions. (c)  After marking the ballot, fill out and sign the "ELECTOR'S CERTIFICATE" in the box on the back of the envelope so that the signature is across the flap of the envelope to ensure the integrity of the ballot.  All absent electors shall have the attesting witness sign the "ATTESTING WITNESS CERTIFICATE" in the box across the flap on the back of the envelope.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  Place the necessary postage on the envelope and deposit it in the post office or some government receptacle provided for the deposit of mail so that the absent elector's ballot will be * * *postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar * * *no more than five (5) business days after by the day before the election.  The ballot may only be transmitted by the United States Postal Service or other common carriers, including, but not limited to, United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation. Any notary public, United States postmaster, assistant United States postmaster, United States postal supervisor, clerk in charge of a contract postal station, or other officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment may be an attesting witness; provided, however, that in the case of an absent elector who is temporarily or permanently physically disabled, the attesting witness may be any person eighteen (18) years of age or older and such person is not required to have the authority to administer an oath.  If a postmaster, assistant postmaster, postal supervisor, or clerk in charge of a contract postal station acts as an attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate must be authenticated by the cancellation stamp of their respective post offices.  If an officer having authority to administer an oath or take an acknowledgment acts as attesting witness, his or her signature in a box on the elector's certificate, together with his or her title and address, but no seal, shall be required.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  Any affidavits made by an absent elector who is in the Armed Forces may be executed before a commissioned officer, warrant officer, or noncommissioned officer not lower in grade than sergeant rating or any person authorized to administer oaths. (d)  When the application accompanies the ballot it shall not be returned in the same envelope as the ballot but shall be returned in a separate pre-addressed envelope provided by the registrar. (e)  A candidate for public office, or the spouse, parent or child of a candidate for public office, may not be an attesting witness for any absentee ballot upon which the candidate's name appears, unless the voter is related within the first degree to the candidate or the spouse, parent or child of the candidate. (f)  Any voter casting an absentee ballot who declares that he or she requires assistance to vote by reason of blindness, temporary or permanent physical disability or inability to read or write, shall be entitled to receive assistance in the marking of his or her absentee ballot and in completing the affidavit on the absentee ballot envelope.  The voter may be given assistance by anyone of the voter's choice other than a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked, the spouse, parent or child of a candidate whose name appears on the absentee ballot being marked or the voter's employer, an agent of that employer or a union representative; however, a candidate whose name is on the ballot or the spouse, parent or child of such candidate may provide assistance upon request to any voter who is related within the first degree.  In order to ensure the integrity of the ballot, any person who provides assistance to an absentee voter shall be required to sign and complete the "Certificate of Person Providing Voter Assistance" on the absentee ballot envelope. (2)  The foregoing instructions required to be provided by the registrar to the elector shall also constitute the substantive law pertaining to the handling of absentee ballots by the elector and registrar. (3)  The Secretary of State shall prepare instructions on how absent voters may comply with the identification requirements of Section 23-15-563. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-637, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-637.  (1)  (a) Absentee ballots and applications received by mail, except for fax or electronically transmitted ballots as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-699 for UOCAVA ballots, or common carrier, such as United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation, must be postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar no more than five (5) business days after the election; any received after such time shall be handled as provided in Section 23-15-647 and shall not be counted. (b)  All ballots cast by the absent elector appearing in person in the office of the registrar shall be cast with an absentee paper ballot and deposited into a sealed ballot box by the voter, not later than 12:00 noon on the Saturday immediately preceding elections held on Tuesday, the Thursday immediately preceding elections held on Saturday, or the second day immediately preceding the date of elections held on other days.  At the close of business each day at the office of the registrar, the ballot box used shall be sealed and not unsealed until the beginning of the next business day, and the seal number shall be recorded with the number of ballots cast which shall be stored in a secure location in the registrar's office. (2)  The registrar shall deposit all absentee ballots which have been timely cast and received by mail in a secured and sealed box in a designated location in the registrar's office upon receipt.  The registrar shall not send any absentee ballots to the precinct polling locations. (3)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that when a qualified elector who is qualified to vote absentee votes by absentee ballot, either by mail or in person with a regular paper ballot, that person's absentee vote is final and he or she may not vote at the polling place on election day. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that absentee ballots shall remain in the registrar's office for counting and not be taken to the precincts on election day. [From and after the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-637.  (1)  (a) Absentee ballots and applications received by mail, except for fax or electronically transmitted ballots as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-699 for UOCAVA ballots, or common carrier, such as United Parcel Service or FedEx Corporation, must be * * *postmarked on or before the date of the election and received by the registrar * * *no more than five (5) business days after by the day before the election; any received after such time shall be handled as provided in Section 23-15-647 and shall not be counted. (b)  All ballots cast by the absent elector appearing in person in the office of the registrar shall be cast with an absentee paper ballot and deposited into a sealed ballot box by the voter, not later than 12:00 noon on the Saturday immediately preceding elections held on Tuesday, the Thursday immediately preceding elections held on Saturday, or the second day immediately preceding the date of elections held on other days.  At the close of business each day at the office of the registrar, the ballot box used shall be sealed and not unsealed until the beginning of the next business day, and the seal number shall be recorded with the number of ballots cast which shall be stored in a secure location in the registrar's office. (2)  The registrar shall deposit all absentee ballots which have been timely cast and received by mail in a secured and sealed box in a designated location in the registrar's office upon receipt.  The registrar shall not send any absentee ballots to the precinct polling locations. (3)  The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that when a qualified elector who is qualified to vote absentee votes by absentee ballot, either by mail or in person with a regular paper ballot, that person's absentee vote is final and he or she may not vote at the polling place on election day. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the Secretary of State shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to ensure that absentee ballots shall remain in the registrar's office for counting and not be taken to the precincts on election day. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-639, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-639.  (1)  The examination and counting of all absentee ballots shall be conducted as follows: (a)  At the opening of the regular balloting and at the opening of the polls, the resolution board established under Section 23-15-523 and trained in the process of canvassing absentee ballots shall first take the envelopes containing the absentee ballots of such electors from the secure location at the registrar's office, and the name, address and precinct inscribed on each envelope shall be announced by the resolution board. (b)  (i)  For absentee ballots that were received by mail, the signature on the application shall then be compared with the signature in the box on the back of the envelope.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  If it corresponds and the affidavit, if one is required, is sufficient and the resolution board finds that the applicant is a registered and qualified voter or otherwise qualified to vote, the envelope shall then be opened and the ballot removed from the envelope, without its being unfolded, or permitted to be unfolded or examined. (ii)  For absentee ballots that were cast in person in the registrar's office, the resolution board shall confirm that the voter completed the application on the front of the envelope and signed the elector's certificate in the box on the back of the envelope.  If it is signed and the resolution board finds that the applicant is a registered and qualified voter or otherwise qualified to vote, the envelope shall be opened and the absentee ballot removed from the envelope, without its being unfolded, or permitted to be unfolded or examined. (c)  Having observed and found the ballot to be regular as far as can be observed from its official endorsement, the resolution board shall deposit it in the ballot box with the other ballots before counting any ballots and enter the voter's name in the receipt book provided for that purpose.  All absentee ballots received prior to 7:00 p.m. the day before the election shall be counted in the registrar's office by the resolution board when the polls close and then added to the votes cast in each precinct.  All absentee ballots received after 7:00 p.m. the day before the election but not later than the fifth business day after the election shall be processed by the resolution board. (2)  The resolution board shall also take such action as may be prescribed by the Secretary of State to ensure compliance with the identification requirements of Section 23-15-563. (3)  The resolution board shall process the absentee ballots using the procedure provided in subsection (1) of this section. [From and after the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-639.  (1)  The examination and counting of all absentee ballots shall be conducted as follows: (a)  At the opening of the regular balloting and at the opening of the polls, the resolution board established under Section 23-15-523 and trained in the process of canvassing absentee ballots shall first take the envelopes containing the absentee ballots of such electors from the secure location at the registrar's office, and the name, address and precinct inscribed on each envelope shall be announced by the resolution board. (b)  (i)  For absentee ballots that were received by mail, the signature on the application shall then be compared with the signature in the box on the back of the envelope.  A portion of the elector's signature extending outside of the box shall not be grounds for rejecting that elector's ballot.  If it corresponds and the affidavit, if one is required, is sufficient and the resolution board finds that the applicant is a registered and qualified voter or otherwise qualified to vote, the envelope shall then be opened and the ballot removed from the envelope, without its being unfolded, or permitted to be unfolded or examined. (ii)  For absentee ballots that were cast in person in the registrar's office, the resolution board shall confirm that the voter completed the application on the front of the envelope and signed the elector's certificate in the box on the back of the envelope.  If it is signed and the resolution board finds that the applicant is a registered and qualified voter or otherwise qualified to vote, the envelope shall be opened and the absentee ballot removed from the envelope, without its being unfolded, or permitted to be unfolded or examined. (c)  Having observed and found the ballot to be regular as far as can be observed from its official endorsement, the resolution board shall deposit it in the ballot box with the other ballots before counting any ballots and enter the voter's name in the receipt book provided for that purpose.  All absentee ballots received prior to 7:00 p.m. the day before the election shall be counted in the registrar's office by the resolution board when the polls close and then added to the votes cast in each precinct.  * * *  All absentee ballots received after 7:00 p.m. the day before the election but not later than the fifth business day after the election shall be processed by the resolution board. (2)  The resolution board shall also take such action as may be prescribed by the Secretary of State to ensure compliance with the identification requirements of Section 23-15-563. (3)  The resolution board shall process the absentee ballots using the procedure provided in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 4.  Section 23-15-651, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-651.  The results of the vote by absentee balloting shall be announced simultaneously with the vote cast on election day; provided that absentee ballots received after 7:00 p.m. the day before the election shall be kept in a secured and sealed ballot box, and shall be announced after the five-business-day period for receiving absentee ballots. [From and after the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-651.  The results of the vote by absentee balloting shall be announced simultaneously with the vote cast on election day * * *; provided that absentee ballots received after 7:00 p.m. the day before the election shall be kept in a secured and sealed ballot box, and shall be announced after the five‑business‑day period for receiving absentee ballots. SECTION 5.  Section 23-15-721, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: [Until the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-721.  (1)  Absentee ballots requested under the provisions of Section 23-15-715 for electors temporarily residing outside the county of residence shall be mailed to the elector's address outside of the county in which he or she is registered, and such electors shall appear before any official authorized to administer oaths or other official authorized to witness absentee balloting as provided in this article.  The elector shall exhibit to such official his or her absentee ballot unmarked and thereupon proceed in secret to fill in the ballot.  After the elector has properly marked the ballot and properly folded it, he or she shall deposit it in the envelope furnished to him or her.  After the elector has sealed the envelope he or she shall deliver it to the official before whom he or she is appearing and shall subscribe and swear to the elector's certificate provided for in Section 23-15-635, which affidavit shall be printed on the back of the envelope as provided for in Section 23-15-635 containing the elector's ballot. (2)  Electors who are temporarily or permanently physically disabled shall sign the elector's certificate and the certificate of attesting witness shall be signed by any person eighteen (18) years of age or older. (3)  After the completion of the requirements of this section, the elector shall mail the envelope containing the ballot to the registrar in the county wherein the elector is qualified to vote.  The ballots must be postmarked by the date of the election and received by the registrar no more than five (5) business days after the election to be counted; any received after such time shall be handled as provided in Section 23-15-647 and shall not be counted. [From and after the date on which the State Attorney General determines and publishes in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots are preempted by federal law, this section will read as follows:] 23-15-721.  (1)  Absentee ballots requested under the provisions of Section 23-15-715 for electors temporarily residing outside the county of residence shall be mailed to the elector's address outside of the county in which he or she is registered, and such electors shall appear before any official authorized to administer oaths or other official authorized to witness absentee balloting as provided in this article.  The elector shall exhibit to such official his or her absentee ballot unmarked and thereupon proceed in secret to fill in the ballot.  After the elector has properly marked the ballot and properly folded it, he or she shall deposit it in the envelope furnished to him or her.  After the elector has sealed the envelope he or she shall deliver it to the official before whom he or she is appearing and shall subscribe and swear to the elector's certificate provided for in Section 23-15-635, which affidavit shall be printed on the back of the envelope as provided for in Section 23-15-635 containing the elector's ballot. (2)  Electors who are temporarily or permanently physically disabled shall sign the elector's certificate and the certificate of attesting witness shall be signed by any person eighteen (18) years of age or older. (3)  After the completion of the requirements of this section, the elector shall mail the envelope containing the ballot to the registrar in the county wherein the elector is qualified to vote.  The ballots must be postmarked by the date of the election and received by the registrar * * *no more than five (5) business days after by the day before the election to be counted; any received after such time shall be handled as provided in Section 23-15-647 and shall not be counted. SECTION 6.  At such time that the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi determines that the United States Supreme Court has made a determination that state laws governing absentee and mail-in ballots, namely Sections 23-15-631, 23-15-637, 23-15-639, 23-15-651 and 23-15-721, are preempted by federal law, namely 2 USC Section 7, 2 USC Section 1 and 3 USC Section 1, and that as a result, the counting of absentee ballots postmarked on or before election day that are received within five (5) business days after the date of a federal election may not be accepted or counted, the Attorney General shall publish this determination of that fact in the administrative bulletin published by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 25-43-2.101. SECTION 7.  (1) If a provision of this act is found to be unconstitutional, that provision is severable; and the other provisions of this act remain effective except as provided in other sections of this act. (2)  This act, or a provision of this act, may not be construed to repeal, by implication or otherwise, any provision of law not explicitly repealed. (3)  If a provision of this act is ever declared unconstitutional or its enforcement temporarily or permanently restricted or enjoined by judicial order, the provisions of Sections 23-15-631, 23-15-637, 23-15-639, 23-15-651 and 23-15-721 shall be enforced.  However, if the temporary or permanent restraining order or injunction is subsequently stayed or dissolved or the declaration vacated or any similar court order otherwise ceases to have effect, all provisions of this act that are not declared unconstitutional or whose enforcement is not restrained shall have full force and effect. (4)  The provisions of Sections 23-15-631, 23-15-637, 23-15-639, 23-15-651 and 23-15-721 may not be construed to permit any action that is prohibited by this act, and to the extent that a provision of Section 23-15-631, 23-15-637, 23-15-639, 23-15-651 or 23-15-721 would be so construed, then the provisions of this act shall take precedence. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.